Utah statutes.
53A-1-1103.   State Board of Education to establish school grading system -- Report to Education Interim Committee.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall establish a school grading system in accordance with this part in which a school annually is designated a grade of A, B, C, D, or F based on the performance of the school's students on statewide assessments, and for a high school, the graduation rate and measures that indicate college and career readiness.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall:

(a)  model the school grading system described in this part using school performance data for the 2010-11 school year;

(b)  study modifications to the school grading system; and

(c)  make recommendations for proposed legislation to the Education Interim Committee on modifications to the school grading system by the committee's September 2012 meeting.

(3)  The school grading system shall take effect for the 2012-13 school year and shall replace the U-PASS accountability system developed and implemented by the State Board of Education.



Amended by Chapter 100, 2012 General Session

